Oklahoma, session 2026, SB1626.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:


SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 366 of Title 36, unless there is


created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:

Req. No. 2456 Page 1


A. As used in this section:


1. “All-or-nothing clause” means a provision of a health care


contract that requires the health insurance carrier or health plan


administrator to include all members of a health care provider in a


network plan or requires the health insurance carrier or health plan


administrator to enter into any additional contract with an


affiliate of the health care provider as a condition of entering


into a contract with such health care provider;


2. “Anti-steering clause” means a provision of a health care


contract that restricts the ability of the health insurance carrier


or health plan administrator to encourage an enrollee to obtain a


health care service from a competitor of the hospital or health


system, or the ability to offer incentives to encourage enrollees to


utilize specific health care providers;


3. “Anti-tiering clause” means a provision in a health care


contract that restricts the ability of the health insurance carrier


or health plan administrator to introduce or modify a tiered network


plan or assign health care providers into tiers or requires the


health insurance carrier or health plan administrator to place all


members of a health care provider in the same tier of a tiered


network;


4. “Enrollee” means an individual who is entitled to receive


health care services under the terms of a health benefit plan;



Req. No. 2456 Page 2


5. “Gag clause” means a provision of a health care contract


that restricts the ability of either the health insurance carrier,


health plan administrator, or provider to disclose:


a. any price or quality information, including the


allowed amount, negotiated rates or discounts, any


fees for services, or any other claim-related


financial obligations included in the provider


contract, to a governmental entity as authorized by


law or its contractors or agents, any enrollee,


treating provider, plan sponsor, or potential eligible


enrollee and plan sponsor, or


b. out-of-pocket costs to an enrollee;


6. “Health benefit plan” means the same as defined in Section


6060.4 of Title 36 of the Oklahoma Statutes;


7. “Health care contract” means a contract, agreement, or


understanding, entered into, amended, restated, or renewed either


orally or in writing between a health care provider and a health


insurance carrier, health plan administrator, plan sponsor, or its


contractors or agents for the delivery of health care services to an


enrollee of a health benefit plan;


8. “Health care provider” means an entity, corporation,


organization, parent corporation, member, affiliate, subsidiary, or


entity under common ownership, whether for-profit or nonprofit, that


is or whose members are licensed or otherwise authorized by this

Req. No. 2456 Page 3


state to furnish, bill, or receive payment for health care service


delivery in the normal course of business, and includes health


systems, hospitals, hospital-based facilities, freestanding


emergency facilities, imaging centers, large physician groups with


eight or more physicians, physician staffing organizations, and


urgent care clinics;


9. “Health insurance carrier” means the same as defined in


Section 6592 of Title 36 of the Oklahoma Statutes;


10. “Health plan administrator” means a third-party


administrator who acts on behalf of a plan sponsor to administer a


health benefit plan;


11. “Most-favored-nations clause” means a provision of a health


care contract that:


a. prohibits or grants a health insurance carrier or


health plan administrator an option to prohibit a


participating health care provider from contracting


with another contracting entity to provide health care


services at the same or a lower price than the payment


specified in the health care contract,


b. requires or grants a health insurance carrier or


health plan administrator an option to require a


participating health care provider to accept a lower


payment in the event the participating health care



Req. No. 2456 Page 4


provider agrees to provide health care services to


another contracting entity at a lower price,


c. requires or grants a health insurance carrier or


health plan administrator an option to require


termination or renegotiation of an existing health


care contract if a participating health care provider


agrees to provide health care services to another


contracting entity at the same or a lower price, or


d. restricts other health insurance carriers or health


plan administrators not party to the contract from


paying the same or lower rates for items or services


than the contracting health insurance carrier or


health plan administrator pays for such items or


services;


12. “Network plan” means a health benefit plan that either


requires enrollees to use, or creates incentives for enrollees to


use, certain health care providers managed, owned, affiliated, under


contract with, or employed by a health insurance carrier, a health


plan administrator, or plan sponsor. Network plans include health


maintenance organization (HMO) plans, preferred provider


organization (PPO) plans, and exclusive provider organization (EPO)


plans; and


13. “Tiered network plan” means a health benefit plan that


sorts health care providers into specific groups to which different

Req. No. 2456 Page 5


provider reimbursement, enrollee cost sharing, or provider access


requirements are applied for the same services.


B. Except as provided in this subsection, no health insurance


carrier, health care provider, health plan administrator, or any


agent or other entity that contracts on behalf of a health insurance


carrier, a health care provider, or a health plan administrator


shall offer, solicit, request, amend, renew, or enter into a health


care contract that would include any of the following provisions:


1. An all-or-nothing clause;


2. An anti-steering clause;


3. An anti-tiering clause;


4. A gag clause;


5. A most-favored-nations clause; or


6. Any other clause that results or intends to result in


anticompetitive effects as specified through regulation by the


Insurance Commissioner.


C. Except as provided in subsection D of this section, a


violation of this section constitutes an unfair or deceptive act


under Section 1204 of Title 36 of the Oklahoma Statutes and shall be


subject to enforcement by the Attorney General.


D. 1. A party to a health care contract that contains a


provision specified in subsection B of this section may submit the


health care contract to the Commissioner for a waiver. The health


care contract shall be accompanied by:

Req. No. 2456 Page 6


a. the name and business address of each party to the


health care contract,


b. any identification of each location at which any party


to the agreement or policy provides health care


services, and


c. any information required to demonstrate that the


proposed agreement or policy results in an improvement


in the welfare of consumers in this state that could


not have been accomplished through alternative means


that are less restrictive.


2. The Commissioner shall approve or deny any waiver


application in writing within sixty (60) days. The Commissioner may


approve a waiver to allow a contract to include a provision pursuant


to subsection B of this section if the Commissioner determines that:


a. the agreement or policy results in an improvement in


the welfare of consumers in this state such that the


competitive benefit of including the provision


outweighs the harm to competition,


b. such improvement in the welfare could not have been


accomplished through alternative means that are less


restrictive, and


c. the agreement or policy shall not otherwise constitute


a contract, combination, or conspiracy in restraint of


trade.

Req. No. 2456 Page 7


3. Except for contracts granted a waiver under this subsection,


any provision of a health care contract described in subsection B of


this section shall be unenforceable.


E. The Attorney General may subpoena any records necessary to


enforce any provisions of this section or to investigate suspected


violations of any provisions of this section. The Attorney General


may institute proceedings on behalf of this state or as parens


patriae of the persons residing in this state for injunctive relief


to prevent and restrain a violation of any provision of this


section, civil penalties for violations of the provisions of


subsection D of this section, criminal penalties for violations of


the provisions of subsection D of this section, and other equitable


relief for violations of the provisions of this section including,


without limitation, disgorgement or restitution.


F. 1. All records and papers of health insurance carriers


pertaining to health benefit plans or negotiations between the


health insurance carrier and any health care provider shall be


subject to inspection by the Commissioner or by any agent he or she


may designate for that purpose. The Commissioner may require any


health insurance carrier to produce a list of all health care


contracts, transactions, or pricing agreements entered into within


the preceding twelve (12) months.


2. Except for contracts granted a waiver under subsection D of


this section, the Commissioner may impose an administrative penalty

Req. No. 2456 Page 8


of up to Five Thousand Dollars ($5,000.00) upon a health insurance


carrier per day for each day that a contract that has been deemed


unenforceable pursuant to subsection D of this section is in effect.


3. The Commissioner may deny the sale of any health insurance


plan where the contract between the health insurance carrier and any


health care provider is in violation of subsection D of this


section.


4. The Commissioner may refer any health care contract subject


to this section to the Attorney General to review for compliance


with this section. The referral of any health care contract by the


Commissioner to the Attorney General shall not constitute a


violation any confidentiality agreement between the health insurance


carrier and the Commissioner that may exist under Title 36 of the


Oklahoma Statutes. The authority of the Attorney General to


prosecute violations of antitrust or consumer protection


requirements shall not be altered by this section.


G. Any party that suffers a loss as a result of the violation


of this section shall be entitled to initiate an action and seek all


remedies, damages, costs, and fees.


H. Nothing in this section shall be construed to limit network


design, cost, or quality initiatives by a group health plan, health


insurance carrier, or administrators working on behalf of a plan


sponsor, including accountable care organizations, exclusive


provider organizations, networks that tier providers by cost or

Req. No. 2456 Page 9


quality or steer enrollees to centers of excellence, or other pay-


for-performance programs.


I. The Commissioner may promulgate rules and regulations


necessary for the provisions of this section.


SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2026.




60-2-2456 CAD 1/13/2026 4:38:24 PM



































Req. No. 2456 Page 10